Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4143.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Executive agency” means all state officers, boards, commissions, departments, in-
stitutions, branches, agencies, divisions and other entities, without regard to the designation
given to those entities, that are within the executive branch of government as described in
Article III, section 1, of the Oregon Constitution.
(b) “Federal government” means the United States or any agency or instrumentality of
the United States.
(c) “Qualified payment” means moneys that a state agency is obligated to transfer to the
federal government pursuant to contract or federal law, but excluding:
(A) Payroll taxes for officers or employees of state agencies;
(B) Amounts voluntarily withheld from unemployment insurance and paid family and
medical leave insurance benefits for federal income tax purposes; and
(C) Any revenues collected or overpaid benefits recovered pursuant to the Federal Un-
employment Tax Act or ORS chapter 657.
(d) “State agency” means every state officer, board, commission, department, institution,
branch or agency of the state government, whose costs are paid wholly or in part from funds
held in the State Treasury.
(e) “Unlawfully withheld federal moneys” means moneys that are subject to a valid order
of a court of competent jurisdiction requiring the transfer of the moneys from the federal
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 175

A-Eng. HB 4143
government to a state agency and that have not been so transferred.
(2) The Governor, with the consent of the Attorney General and the State Treasurer,
may direct an executive agency to withhold qualified payments from the federal government
if unlawfully withheld federal moneys are owed to the state.
(3) An executive agency that is directed to withhold qualified payments under this section
shall transfer the qualified payments to the Federal Moneys Holding Account established
under section 2 of this 2026 Act.
(4) When the Governor determines that the amount of moneys in the Federal Moneys
Holding Account exceeds the aggregate amount of unlawfully withheld federal moneys, the
Governor shall:
(a) Direct one or more executive agencies to pay qualified payments to the federal gov-
ernment to the extent of the excess; and
(b) Direct the Oregon Department of Administrative Services to transfer moneys to the
executive agencies from the Federal Moneys Holding Account in amounts sufficient to make
the qualified payments.
(5) The State of Oregon shall defend, save harmless and indemnify any of its officers,
employees and agents, whether elective or appointive, against any civil claim arising out of
an act or omission taken in compliance with the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. The Federal Moneys Holding Account is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Federal Moneys Holding
Account must be credited to the account. The Federal Moneys Holding Account consists of
moneys deposited in the account under section 1 of this 2026 Act and interest earned on
moneys in the account. The moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services. The department shall transfer moneys from
the account as directed by the Governor under section 1 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2026 Act are repealed on January 2, 2037.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the Federal Moneys Holding Account established under
section 2 of this 2026 Act on the date specified in subsection (1) of this section shall be
transferred to the General Fund to be used for general governmental purposes.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

[2]